Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.2801

Local government accounting—Expense of audit—Additional charge.

(1) From July 1, 1992, to June 30, 1995, the state auditor shall charge an entity subject to an audit an additional ten cents per hour billed under RCW 43.09.270 and 43.09.280, to be deposited in the local government administrative hearings account.

(2) After June 30, 1995, the state auditor shall base the amount to be collected and deposited into the local government administrative hearings account on the funds remaining in the account on June 30, 1995, and the anticipated caseload for the future.

(3) The state auditor may exempt a local government that certifies that it is in compliance with RCW 42.41.050 from a charge added under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.

[ 1995 c 301 s 19; 1992 c 44 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1992 c 44: See RCW 42.41.901.

Local government administrative hearings account: RCW 42.41.060.